Hawaii, session 2026, HB2485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new subpart to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "   .  Cardiovascular Screening and Sudden Cardiac Arrest §302A-A  Cardiovascular screening for student athletes.  (a) Beginning with the school year, a qualified health care professional who performs a physical examination for student athletes shall include a cardiovascular screening that follows nationally recognized, evidence-based guidelines recommended by organizations focused on cardiovascular care in pediatric populations. (b) The cardiovascular screening shall include the following elements to detect or that raise suspicion for cardiovascular disease: (1)  Personal history:  Prior elevated systemic blood pressure, unexplained exertional chest pain or syncope, palpitations, or decreased exercise tolerance; (2)  Family history:  Known cardiac conditions, such as cardiomyopathy, arrhythmia syndromes, premature sudden cardiac death, or unexplained drowning or seizures; and (3)  Physical examination:  Detection of a pathologic heart murmur, irregular rhythm, abnormal pulses, or other findings suggestive of structural or electrical heart disease. (c) Student athletes who are screened and receive positive findings shall be referred for further evaluation and testing. (d) The screening conducted pursuant to subsection (a) shall occur no more than three months before the first day of the school year during which the athletic season takes place. (e) The department of health shall compile and publish on its website a publicly available annual report containing the total number of cardiovascular screenings that were completed and the number of referrals that were made to cardiology specialists.  The report shall analyze the outcomes of the requirements established by subsection (a) and include: (1)  The total number of cardiovascular screenings, including utilization and uptake by clinicians; (2)  The proportion of positive screenings and follow-up care; and (3)  Where possible, data regarding follow-up care, including false positive rates and additional diagnostic studies. §302A-B Cardiovascular screening for all students.  (a)  Beginning with the school year, each child shall present to the appropriate school official a report from a qualified health care professional who performs a physical examination as part of an annual well-child visit that includes the results of a cardiovascular screening that follows nationally recognized, evidence-based guidelines recommended by organizations focused on cardiovascular care in pediatric populations. (b) The cardiovascular screening shall include the following elements to detect or that raise suspicion for cardiovascular disease: (1)  Personal history:  Prior elevated systemic blood pressure, unexplained exertional chest pain or syncope, palpitations, or decreased exercise tolerance; (2)  Family history:  Known cardiac conditions, such as cardiomyopathy, arrhythmia syndromes, premature sudden cardiac death, or unexplained drowning or seizures; and (3)  Physical examination:  Detection of a pathologic heart murmur, irregular rhythm, abnormal pulses, or other findings suggestive of structural or electrical heart disease. §302A-C  Sudden cardiac arrest; educational and informational materials.  (a)  In collaboration with the department of health, the department shall distribute to students and their families educational and informational materials that follow evidence-based science about the disease that can cause sudden cardiac arrest. (b) Beginning with the school year, each school district shall annually distribute the educational and informational materials identified in subsection (a) to parents or guardians of students participating in athletics as part of a student athlete's physical examination and permission form requirements. §302A-D  Policies, programs, training, continuing education; cardiovascular screening; department of health.  The department of health shall implement policies, programs, training, and continuing education that increase health care provider knowledge of cardiovascular screening guidelines, including: (1)  How to complete the cardiovascular screening under sections 302A-A and 302A-B, including collecting family history and personal reports of symptoms; (2)  Identifying early signs of cardiac arrest through physical examination; and (3)  Referral procedures for positive findings. §302A-E  Rules; cardiovascular care.  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this subpart.  The department may consult with the department of health as needed to adopt rules that follow nationally recognized, evidence-based guidelines recommended by organizations focused on cardiovascular care in pediatric populations." SECTION 2.  In codifying the new sections added by section 1 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________